Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1590.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of June 13, 1967 (P.L.31, No.21), known as the Human Services Code, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 443.16. Abrogation of Regulatory Requirements for Payment for Clinic Services within Physical Confines of Clinic Facilities.--The following provisions of 55 Pa. Code (relating to human services) are abrogated to the extent they limit medical assistance payments only for clinic services provided within the physical confines of a clinic facility:(1) Section 1153.14(6) (relating to noncovered services).(2) Section 1223.14(11) (relating to noncovered services).12345678910111213141516171819 Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB1590PN1852 - 2 - 1